Maryland, session 2025, HB0559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb0559*

HOUSE BILL 559
Article – Health – General
21–325.
(a) [Each] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, EACH food
establishment shall have:
(1) A convenient toilet that is:
(i) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, separated
from any room in which food is manufactured, prepared, packed, canned, frozen, sold, or
distributed;
(ii) Kept in a sanitary condition; and
(iii) Properly ventilated; and
(2) A convenient lavatory that is:
(i) Supplied with soap, water, towels, or other approved hand drying
devices;
(ii) Kept in a sanitary condition; and
(iii) Properly ventilated.
(b) Each food service facility which prepares food and provides seating for patrons
established after January 1, 1979, shall have available for the public:
(1) A convenient toilet that is kept in a sanitary condition; and
(2) A convenient lavatory that is:
(i) Supplied with soap, water, towels, or other approved hand drying
devices;
(ii) Kept in a sanitary condition; and
(iii) Properly ventilated.
(c) A room that houses a toilet may be constructed within a larger room in which
food is manufactured, prepared, packed, canned, frozen, sold, or distributed.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A FOOD ESTABLISHMENT
THAT IS:

HOUSE BILL 559 3
(I) A BUSINESS THAT CONDUCTS AGRITOURISM, AS DEFINED IN
§ 4–212 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE;
(II) A CLASS 4 LIMITED WINERY LICENSED UNDER § 2–206 OF
THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE; AND
(III) A CLASS 8 FARM BREWERY LICENSED UNDER § 2–210 OF
THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
(2) A FOOD ESTABLISHMENT MAY COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENT
TO PROVIDE A CONVENIENT LAVATORY BY PROVIDING A PORTABLE CHEMICAL
TOILET THAT OTHERWISE:
(I) OTHERWISE MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION
(A)(2) OR (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) IS PLACED AT LEAST 25 FEET FROM A WELL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.